en: Partially skimmed chocolate flavoured milk with sugar fortified with vitamins and chemicals elements
fr: Boisson lactée aromatisée au chocolat sucrée au lait partiellement écrémé enrichie en vitamines et minéraux

en: Vanilla milks
de: Vanillemilch
fr: Laits aromatisés à la vanille, laits à la vanille
hr: Mlijeka od vanilije
ja: バニラミルク
lt: Vanilės skonio pieno gėrimai
nl: Melk met vanille

en: Strawberry milks
fi: Mansikkamaidot
fr: Laits aromatisés à la fraise, laits à la fraise
hr: Mlijeka od jagoda
ja: いちごミルク
lt: Braškių skonio pieno gėrimai
nl: Aardbeienmelk

en: Partially skimmed strawberry flavoured milk with sugar fortified with vitamins D
fr: Boisson lactée aromatisée à la fraise sucrée au lait partiellement écrémé enrichie à la vitamine D

en: Milkshakes, Milk-shakes
ca: Batuts
es: Batidos
fr: Milkshakes, Milk-shakes
hr: Milkshake
ja: ミルクセーキ
lt: Pieniški kokteiliai, pieno kokteiliai
nl: Milkshakes

en: Milkshakes from fast foods restaurant, Milk-shakes from fast foods restaurant
fr: Milkshakes de fast food, Milk-shakes de fast food
hr: Milkshake iz restorana brze hrane
lt: Pieniški kokteiliai iš greito maisto restoranų

en: Weight-loss milkshakes
fr: Milkshakes minceurs
hr: Milkshake za mršavljenje
lt: Pieniški kokteiliai svoriui mesti
nl: Afslankshakes

en: Falooda
fr: Falooda, faluda

en: Semi-skimmed milks, 2% milk
bg: Полуобезмаслено мляко
ca: Llet semidesnatada
da: Letmælk
de: Teilentrahmte Milch, Teilentrahmte Milche, Teilentrahmte Milchen, Fettarme Milch, Fettarme Milche, Fettarme Milchen
es: Leche semidesnatada
fi: vähärasvaiset maidot
fr: Laits demi-écrémés, lait demi-écrémé
hr: Poluobrano mlijeko
it: Latte parzialmente scremato
lt: Pusiau nugriebti pienas, 2% pieno
nl: Halfvolle melken, Halfvolle melk
pt: Leites meio gordo, Leites semi-desnatados, leite semi-desnatado
ru: Молоко 2% жирности
sv: Mellanmjölk, Mellan mjölk
tr: Yarım yağlı süt

en: Organic semi-skimmed milks
ca: Llet orgànica semidesnatada
de: Bio-Magermilch
fi: Luomu kevytmaidot
fr: Laits demi-écrémés biologiques
hr: Organsko poluobrano mlijeko
it: Latte biologico parzialmente scremato
lt: Ekologiški pusiau nugriebtas pienas
nl: Biologische halfvolle melken

en: Semi-skimmed milk with reduced lactose
fr: Laits demi-écrémés à teneur réduite en lactose
hr: Poluobrano mlijeko sa smanjenom količinom laktoze
lt: Pusiau nugriebtas pienas su sumažinta laktoze
nl: Lactosevrije halfvolle melken

en: Semi-skimmed milk UHT
fr: Laits demi-écrémés UHT
hr: Poluobrano mlijeko uht
it: Latte parzialmente scremato UHT

en: Semi-skimmed UHT milk fortified with vitamins
fr: Laits demi-écrémés UHT enrichis en vitamines

en: Semi-skimmed pasteurised milk
bg: Полуобезмаслено пастьоризирано прясно мляко
fr: Laits demi-écrémés pasteurisés
hr: Poluobrano pasterizirano mlijeko
lt: Pusiau nugriebtas pasterizuotas pienas

en: Cow milks
bg: Краве мляко
ca: Llet de vaca
de: Kuhmilch
es: Leche de vaca
fi: Lehmänmaito
fr: Laits de vache
hr: Kravlje mlijeko
hu: Tehéntejek
it: Latte di mucca
ja: 牛乳
lt: Karvės pienas
nl: Koemelk
pl: Krowie mleko, mleko krowie
pt: Leites de vaca
ro: Laptele de vacă, Lapte de vacă
ru: Коровье молоко
sv: Komjölk

en: Goat milks, goat milk
bg: Козе мляко
de: Ziegenmilch
es: Leche de cabra
fi: Vuohenmaito
fr: Laits de chèvre, Lait de chèvre
hr: Kozjeg mlijeka
it: Latte di capra
ja: ヤギ乳, 山羊乳
lt: Ožkų pienas
nl: Geitenmelk
pt: Leites de cabra
ro: Laptele de capră, Lapte de capră
sv: Getmjölk

en: Whole goat milk
bg: Пълномаслено козе мляко
fr: Lait de chèvre entier
hr: Punomasno kozje mlijeko
lt: Nenugriebtas ožkos pienas

en: Whole goat milk UHT
bg: Хомогенизирано пълномаслено козе мляко
fr: Lait de chèvre entier UHT

en: Semi-skimmed goat milks, Half skimmed goat milk
bg: Полуобезмаслено козе мляко
fr: Lait de chèvre demi-écrémé

en: Half skimmed pasteurized goat milk UHT
bg: Полуобезмаслено хомогенизирано козе мляко
fr: Lait de chèvre demi-écrémé UHT